Tennessee, session 114, HB2162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-188(a), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
The final study, and the oral and written comments, may be reported to the committees
in electronic format.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2162
012137
- 1 -